New York, session 2025-2026, S6525.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "New York 2 state nursing shortage correction act". 3 § 2. The labor law is amended by adding a new section 211-b to read as 4 follows: 5 § 211-b. Statewide nursing recruitment incentive and retention pilot 6 initiatives. The department is authorized, within amounts appropriated, 7 to award funding to schools of nursing, other educational institutions 8 and health care providers to develop pilot initiatives to improve the 9 capacity to prepare future generations of entry and advanced level nurs- 10 es. Funding may be used for: 11 1. recruitment and retention incentives that expand faculty capacity; 12 2. initial costs related to the development of new and/or expanded 13 programs, including equipment and capital costs; 14 3. development of clinical simulation laboratories in both new and 15 existing programs; 16 4. academic and clinical partnerships to increase the use of expert 17 clinicians to expand faculty capacity; 18 5. development and expansion of nursing education that is internet-fa- 19 cilitated and/or provided through satellite course-work; 20 6. initiatives to retain retiring nursing faculty and those expert 21 nurses leaving clinical practice to function in educator roles; 22 7. financial assistance to prepare nurses for an academic career; and 23 8. early mentoring programs between school districts, nursing educa- 24 tion programs, and health care providers to introduce students to nurs- 25 ing careers. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11034-01-5 S. 6525 2 1 § 3. The state finance law is amended by adding a new section 91-h to 2 read as follows: 3 § 91-h. New York state nursing recruitment incentive and retention 4 account. 1. There is hereby established in the joint custody of the 5 state comptroller and the commissioner of taxation and finance an 6 account in the miscellaneous special revenue fund to be known as the New 7 York state nursing recruitment incentive and retention account. 8 2. Such account shall consist of all revenues received from contrib- 9 utions, donations and other moneys credited or transferred thereto from 10 any other fund or source pursuant to law. 11 3. Moneys of the account, following appropriation by the legislature 12 may be expended for the New York state nursing recruitment incentive and 13 retention program. Moneys shall be paid out of the account on the audit 14 and warrant of the state comptroller on vouchers certified or approved 15 by the commissioner of education. 16 § 4. This act shall take effect on the first of April next succeeding 17 the date on which it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, 18 the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation neces- 19 sary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 20 authorized and directed to be made and completed by the commissioner of 21 education in consultation with the commissioner of labor on or before 22 such effective date.